Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1,104
Risk Manager; report; contents.

The Risk Manager shall submit electronically a report
to the Clerk of the Legislature by January 15 of each year, which report shall
include the number of claims for which payments have been made, the amounts
paid by categories of medical, hospital, compensation, and other costs separated
by the agency and program or activity under which the claim arose. Each member
of the Legislature shall receive an electronic copy of such
report by making a request for it to the Risk Manager.

Laws 1971, LB 390, § 13;

Laws 1972, LB 1334, § 3;

Laws 1977, LB 399, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 322, § 16;

Laws 1981, LB 545, § 52;

Laws 1981, LB 273, § 13;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 59.